Tennessee, session 114, SB1237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-122(2), is amended by
deleting "two (2) sufficient sureties " and substituting "one (1) sufficient surety".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to bail bonds executed on or after that date.
SB1237
002447
- 1 -